Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-104 Rate filings. (a) Every
insurer shall file with the commissioner every manual of classifications,
rules, and rates, every rating plan, every other rating rule, and every
modification of any of the foregoing that it proposes to use; provided that
filings with regard to specific inland marine risks, which by general custom of
the business are not written according to manual rate or rating plans, and bail
bonds, subject to section 804-62, shall not be required pursuant to this
subsection.

Every filing shall:

(1) State its proposed effective date;

(2) Indicate the character and extent of the coverage
contemplated;

(3) Include a report on investment income; and

(4) Be accompanied by a $50 fee, payable to the
commissioner, to be deposited in the commissioner's education and training
fund.

(b) For each filing, an insurer shall submit
to the commissioner:

(1) An electronic copy of the filing; or

(2) Two printed copies of the filing.

The commissioner may also request a printed version
of an electronic filing to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) At the same time as the filing of the
rate, every insurer shall file all supplementary rating and supporting
information to be used in support of or in conjunction with a rate. The insurer
may satisfy its obligation to file supplementary rating and supporting
information by reference to material which has been approved by the
commissioner. The information furnished in support of a filing may include or
consist of a reference to:

(1) The prospective loss cost filing made by a
rating organization or an advisory organization and approved by the
commissioner;

(2) The experience or judgment of the insurer or
information filed by the rating organization or advisory organization on behalf
of the insurer as permitted by section 431:14-104.5;

(3) Its interpretation of any statistical data upon
which it relies;

(4) The experience of other insurers, rating
organizations, or advisory organizations; or

(5) Any other relevant factors.

(d) When a filing is not accompanied by the
information upon which the insurer supports the filing, and the commissioner
does not have sufficient information to determine whether the filing meets the
requirements of this article, the commissioner shall require the insurer to
furnish additional information and, in that event, the waiting period shall
commence as of the date the information is furnished. Until the requested
information is provided, the filing shall not be deemed complete or filed nor
available for use by the insurer. If the requested information is not provided
within a reasonable time period, the filing may be returned to the insurer as
not filed and not available for use.

(e) Except for rates filed in accordance with
subsections (k), (l), and (m), a filing and any supporting information shall be
open to public inspection upon filing with the commissioner.

(f) Specific inland marine rates on risks
specially rated, made by a rating organization or advisory organization, shall
be filed with the commissioner.

(g) An insurer may satisfy its obligation to
make the filings by becoming a member of, or a subscriber to, a licensed rating
organization or advisory organization that makes the filings, except for those
lines of insurance for which the commissioner determines individual insurer
rate filings shall be made. Nothing contained in this article shall be
construed as requiring any insurer to become a member of or a subscriber to any
rating organization or advisory organization.

(h) After reviewing an insurer's filing, the
commissioner may require that the insurer's rates be based upon the insurer's
own loss and expense information. If the insurer's loss or allocated loss
adjustment expense information is not actuarially credible, as determined by the
commissioner, the insurer may use or supplement its experience with information
filed with the commissioner by a rating organization or advisory organization.
At the commissioner's request, each insurer utilizing the services of a rating
organization or advisory organization must submit with its rate filing, a
description of the rationale for that use, including the insurer's own
information and method of utilizing the rating or advisory organization's
information.

(i) The commissioner shall review filings as
soon as reasonably possible after they have been made to determine whether they
meet the requirements of this article. The commissioner shall calculate the
investment income and accuracy of loss reserves upon which filings are based,
and the insurer shall provide the information necessary to make the
calculation.

(j) Except as provided herein and in
subsections (k) and (l) and section 431:14-120, each filing shall be on file
for a waiting period of thirty days before the filing becomes effective. The
period may be extended by the commissioner for an additional period not to
exceed fifteen days if the commissioner gives written notice within the waiting
period to the insurer, rating organization, or advisory organization that made
the filing that the commissioner needs the additional time for the
consideration of the filing. Upon the written application by the insurer,
rating organization, or advisory organization, the commissioner may authorize a
filing that the commissioner has reviewed to become effective before the
expiration of the waiting period or any extension thereof. A filing shall be
deemed to meet the requirements of this article unless disapproved by the
commissioner, as provided in section 431:14-106, within the waiting period or
any extension thereof.

(k) The following rates shall become effective
when filed:

(1) Specific inland marine rates on risks specially
rated by a rating organization or advisory organization;

(2) Any special filing with respect to a surety or
guaranty bond required by law or by court or executive order or by order or
rule of a public body, not covered by a previous filing; and

(3) Any special filing with respect to any class of
insurance, subdivision, or combination thereof that is subject to individual
risk premium modification and has been agreed to by an insured under a formal
or informal bid process.

The rates shall be deemed to meet the requirements
of this article until the time the commissioner reviews the filing and so long
as the filing remains in effect.

(l) The commissioner, by written order, may
suspend or modify the requirement of filing as to any class of insurance,
subdivision, or combination thereof, or as to classes of risks, the rates for
which cannot practicably be filed before they are used. The orders shall be
made known to the affected insurers, rating organizations, and advisory
organizations. The commissioner may make examinations as the commissioner may
deem advisable to ascertain whether any rates affected by the order meet the standards
set forth in section 431:14-103(a)(1).

(m) The commissioner may approve a rate on any
specific risk in excess of that set by an applicable rate filing, provided the
insured files with the commissioner a written application stating the insured's
reasons for consenting to the excess rate. Upon approval by the commissioner,
the rate shall be deemed effective retroactive to the date of the insured's
application.

(n) No insurer shall make or issue a contract
or policy except in accordance with filings which are in effect for the insurer
as provided in this article or in accordance with subsections (k), (l), or
(m). This subsection shall not apply to contracts or policies for inland
marine risks as to which filings are not required. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as
superseded by c 348, §19; am L 1990, c 255, §9; am L 1993, c 205, §§31, 32; am
L 1995, c 234, §19; am L 1997, c 81, §1; am L 1999, c 5, §2; am L 2004, c 122,
§60; am L 2006, c 154, §39; am L 2009, c 77, §10; am L 2012, c 258, §4]

Cross References

Commissioner's education and training fund, see §431:2-214.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next